Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 10 Water and Sewer District Law
§ 41-10-133.
Resolution may provide that bonds shall recite that they are issued under authority of act; effect of recital.

It may be provided in any resolution authorizing any bonds hereunder that such bond shall recite that it is issued under authority of this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

]. Such recital shall conclusively impart full compliance with all of the provisions of this act, and all bonds issued containing such recital shall be incontestable for any cause whatsoever after their delivery for value.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 33; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.33.

§ 41-10-134.
Date of bonds; maturity; payment and rate of interest; when and where payable; privileges for registration; prerequisite to reissuance upon loss.

General obligation bonds, revenue bonds or special assessment bonds herein authorized to be issued shall bear a date or dates, shall mature in a denomination or denominations at the time or times not exceeding the estimated life of the improvements acquired with the bond proceeds and in no event not more than thirty (30) years from their date, shall bear interest payable annually, or at a lesser interval or intervals as may be prescribed by resolution, shall be payable in a medium of payment at the place or places within or without the state of Wyoming, and at the option of the board may be in one (1) or more series, may be made subject to prior redemption in advance of maturity at the time or times without or with the payment of the premium or premiums not exceeding five percent (5%) of the principal amount of the bond so redeemed, may provide for the payment of interest thereon from the proceeds thereof for a period not to exceed three (3) years from the date thereof, may be issued with privileges for registration for payment as to principal or interest, or both, and generally shall be issued in a manner, in a form, with recitals, terms, covenants and conditions, and with other details as may be provided by the board in the resolution or resolutions authorizing the bonds, except as herein otherwise provided. Pending preparations of the definite bonds, interim receipts or certificates in a form and with such provisions as the board determines may be issued. Except for payment provisions herein specifically provided, the bonds, interest coupons thereto attached, and interim receipts or certificates shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all the purposes of the Uniform Commercial Code — Investment Securities [§§ 34.1-8-101 through 34.1-8-603]. If lost or completely destroyed, a bond may be reissued in the form and tenor of the lost or destroyed bond upon the owner furnishing, to the satisfaction of the governing body, (a) proof of ownership, (b) proof of loss or destruction, (c) a surety bond in twice the face amount of the bond and coupons, and (d) payment of the cost of preparing and issuing the new bond.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 34; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.34; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 40; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 41-10-135.
Execution of bonds; signature by chairman of board to appear on bonds and coupons attached; legal effect of signature.

Any such general obligation bonds, revenue bonds or special assessment bonds shall be executed in the name of and on behalf of the district and signed by the chairman of the board with the seal of the district affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of the board. Except for such bonds which are registerable for payment of interest, interest coupons payable to bearer shall be attached to the bonds and shall bear the original or facsimile signature of the chairman of the board. The bonds and coupons, bearing the signatures of the officers in office at the time of the signing thereof, shall be the valid and binding obligations of the district, notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor, any or all of the persons whose signatures appear thereon shall have ceased to fill their respective offices.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 35; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.35.

§ 41-10-136.
Sale of bonds at public or private sale; price; delivery of bonds to and acceptance by contractors in payment of contract price; interest rate on special assessment bonds.

General obligation bonds, revenue bonds or special assessment bonds shall be sold at public or private sale for not less than the principal amount thereof and accrued interest, or at the board’s option below par at a discount not exceeding five percent (5%) of the principal amount thereof, for the payment of the contractor or contractors, for the acquisition of property and rights thereto, including but not limited to labor, supplies and materials acquired by the district or supplied under agreement with the United States of America, the state of Wyoming, or a federal or state agency, instrumentality or corporation or other political subdivision and for all proper incidental expenses; provided, however, the bonds may be delivered to the contractor or contractors. If delivered to the contractor or contractors, the bonds shall be accepted for the principal amount thereof, plus interest due thereon to the date of their delivery, in payment of the amounts due under the contract or contracts, and the contractor or contractors may be required to accept delivery of all or a part of the remainder of the authorized issue of bonds and to pay therefor the principal amount thereof and accrued interest to the date of delivery, so that money will be available to the board to be expended in the payment of the incidental expenses for the payment of which the bonds were in part authorized. No special assessment bond interest rate shall at one (1) time exceed the interest rate (or lower or lowest rate if more than one (1)) borne by the special assessments, but a bond interest rate may be the same as or less than an assessment interest rate, subject to the aforesaid limitation, as the board may determine. In advertising for construction bids, the board may stipulate that the contractor must accept bonds in payment of the contract price.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 36; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.36; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 41; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

§ 41-10-137.
Moneys received from issuance of bonds to be used solely for purpose for which issued; disposition of unexpended balance; validity of bonds not dependent upon validity of proceedings relating to project.

All monies received from the issuance of any bonds herein authorized shall be used solely for the purpose (or purposes) for which issued, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, if so authorized the payment of preliminary expenses; provided, however, that any unexpended balance of such bond proceeds remaining after the completion of the acquisition or improvement of the project or service for which such bonds were issued shall be paid immediately into the fund created for the payment of the principal of said bonds and shall be used therefor. The validity of said bonds shall not be dependent on nor affected by the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the acquisition or improvement of the project for which the bonds are issued; and the purchaser or purchasers of the bonds shall in no manner be responsible for the application of the proceeds of the bonds by the district or any of its officers, agents and employees.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 37; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.37.

§ 41-10-138.
Covenants in resolution authorizing issuance of bonds.

Any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds under this act may contain covenants (notwithstanding such covenants may limit the exercise of powers conferred by this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

]) as to any one (1) or more of the following:

The tolls, fees, rates, rentals, charges, special assessments, and general taxes to be fixed, charged or levied and the collection, use and disposition thereof, including but not limited to joint billing for and the discontinuance of facilities, commodities or projects, the foreclosure of liens for delinquencies and the collection of penalties;

The creation and maintenance of reserves or sinking funds and the regulation, use and disposition thereof;

A fair and reasonable payment by the district from its general fund or other available moneys to the account of a designated project for the facilities or commodities furnished or services rendered thereby to the district or any of its departments, boards or agencies;

The purpose or purposes to which the proceeds of the sale of bonds may be applied and the use and disposition thereof;

The issuance of other or additional bonds payable from or constituting a charge against or lien upon any revenues pledged for the payment of bonds and the creation of future liens and encumbrances thereagainst;

The operation and maintenance of any project;

The insurance to be carried thereon and use and disposition of insurance moneys;

Books of account and the inspection and audit thereof;

Events of default, rights and liabilities arising therefrom, and the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by the district of any covenants, conditions, or obligations;

The vesting in a trustee or trustees, and the limitation of liabilities thereof, and as to the terms and conditions upon which the holders of the bonds or any portion, percentage or amount of them may enforce any covenants made under this act or duties imposed thereby;

The terms and conditions upon which the holders of the bonds or of a specified portion, percentage or amount thereof, or any trustee therefor, shall be entitled to the appointment of a receiver, which receiver may enter and take possession of any project or service, operate and maintain the same, prescribe tolls, fees, rates, rentals, charges and taxes, and collect, receive and apply all revenues thereafter arising therefrom in the same manner as the district itself might do;

A procedure by which the terms of any resolution authorizing bonds, or any other contract with any holders of bonds, including but not limited to an indenture of trust or similar instrument, may be amended or abrogated, and as to the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given;

The terms and conditions upon which any or all of the bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity, and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived; and

All such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure the district’s bonds, or in the discretion of the board tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenant, act or thing may not be enumerated herein, it being the intention hereof to give a district power to do all things in the issuance of bonds and for their security except as herein specifically limited.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 38; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.38.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-10-139.
Rights and powers of holders of bonds.

Subject to any contractual limitations binding upon the holders of any issue or series of bonds, or trustee therefor, including but not limited to the restriction of the exercise of any remedy to a specified proportion, percentage or number of such holders, any holder of bonds, or trustee therefor, shall have the right and power, for the equal benefit and protection of all holders of bonds similarly situated:

By mandamus or other suit, action or proceeding at law or in equity to enforce his rights against the district and its board and any of its officers, agents and employees and to require and compel the district or its board or any such officers, agents, or employees to perform and carry out its and their duties, obligations or other commitments under this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

] and its and their covenants and agreements with the bondholders;

By action or suit in equity to require the district and its board to account as if they were the trustee of an express trust;

By action or suit in equity to have appointed a receiver, which receiver may enter and take possession of any projects and services revenues from which are pledged for the payment of the bonds, prescribe sufficient tolls, fees, rates, rentals and charges derived from the operation thereof, and collect, receive and apply all revenues or other moneys pledged for the payment of the bonds in the same manner as the district itself might do;

By action or suit in equity enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or in violation of the rights of the bondholders; and

Bring suit upon the bonds.

No right or remedy conferred by this act upon any holder of bonds or any trustee therefor is intended to be exclusive of other right or remedy, but each such right or remedy is cumulative and in addition to every other right or remedy and may be exercised without exhausting and without regard to any other remedy conferred by this act or by any other law. The failure of any bondholder so to proceed as herein provided shall not relieve the district, its board, or any of its officers, agents and employees of any liability for failure to perform or carry out any duty, obligation or other commitment.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 39; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.39.

§ 41-10-140.
Publication of resolution or other proceedings relative to issuance of bonds; right of interested person to contest legality within 30 days; incontestable thereafter.

The board may provide for the publication once in a newspaper of general circulation in the district of any resolution or other proceedings adopted by the board ordering the issuance of any bonds. For a period of thirty (30) days after the date of such publication, any person in interest shall have the right to contest the legality of any bond which may be authorized thereby (except for any bond delivered for value, containing a recital therein that it is issued under authority of this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

], and thus being incontestable for any cause whatsoever, as herein provided), and of the provisions made for the security and payment of any such bonds, and of any other provisions in such resolution or proceedings; and after the expiration of such thirty (30) day period no one shall have any cause of action to contest the regularity, formality, or legality thereof for any cause whatsoever.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 40; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.40.

§ 41-10-141.
Payment of preliminary expenses incurred in making surveys, estimates of costs and revenues prior to issuance of bonds.

The district may provide for the payment of all necessary preliminary expenses actually incurred in the making of surveys, estimates of costs and revenues, the employment of engineers, architects, fiscal agents, attorneys-at-law, clerical help, other agents or employees, the making of notices, taking of options, and all other expenses necessary or desirable to be made and paid prior to the authorization for or the issuance of such bonds; provided, no such expenditures shall be made or paid unless an appropriation has been budgeted and made therefor in the same manner as is required by law, or unless the proceeds of bonds or other moneys are available to defray such expenses. Any funds so expended by the district for preliminary expenses incurred in connection with the same purpose as that for which bonds are issued may be fully reimbursed and repaid to the district out of the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds. The amount so advanced by the district to pay such preliminary expenses may by a resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds be made a first charge against such bond proceeds until the same has been repaid as herein provided, and in such event said amount shall be paid therewith before any other disbursements are made therefrom.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 41; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.41.

§ 41-10-142.
Refunding bonds.

Any bonds issued under this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

] may be refunded without an election pursuant to a resolution or resolutions to be adopted by the board in the manner herein provided for the issuance of other bonds, subject to any contractual limitations. Refunding bonds so issued may be secured in such manner and may be made payable from such sources as was provided in the resolution or resolutions authorizing their issuance; provided, however, that the security for the payment of the refunding bonds shall not be greater than the security for the payment of the bonds refunded, nor shall there be pledged for the payment of the refunding bonds revenues which are not pledged for the payment of the bonds refunded. Refunding bonds so issued may be sold at public or private sale or may be exchanged dollar for dollar for the bonds to be refunded. If sold, the proceeds of sale may be escrowed for the payment of the bonds to be refunded in such manner as may be provided in resolution authorizing the refunding bonds.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 42; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.42.

§ 41-10-143.
Duty of board to impose tolls, fees and charges sufficient to pay cost of operating project and pay principal and interest on revenue bonds.

Whenever revenue bonds are issued hereunder, it shall be the duty of the board to impose, in connection with the project for which the bonds are issued, for the services rendered or facilities furnished thereby, tolls, fees, rates, rentals and charges fully sufficient to pay the cost of operating and maintaining the project, including but not limited to betterments or replacements to keep the same in good repair and working order (which cost shall be a first lien and charge upon the revenues or income to be derived from the operation of the project or service), and to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds, and to carry out all commitments made in the resolution or resolutions authorizing the bonds.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 43; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.43.

§ 41-10-144.
Exemption of property and bonds from taxation.

The effectuation of the authorized purposes of districts organized under this act [41-10-101 through

41-10-151

] shall and will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state of Wyoming residing within the district, for the increase of their commerce and prosperity and for the improvement of their health and living conditions; and since the districts will be performing essential governmental functions in effectuating those purposes, the districts shall not be required to pay any general (ad valorem) taxes upon any property acquired or used by them within the boundaries of the district. The bonds issued by any district, their transfer and the income therefrom shall be free from taxation within the state, except for estate taxes.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 44; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.44; Laws 1982, ch. 74, § 2.

§ 41-10-145.
Authority of municipalities, counties and special districts to transfer projects and property to district with or without consideration.

Any municipality, county, special district or owner may and is hereby authorized to sell, lease, grant, convey, transfer, or pay over to any district with or without consideration any project or any part or parts thereof or any interest in real or personal property or any funds available for construction or improvement purposes, including the proceeds of bonds previously or hereafter issued for construction or improvement purposes which may be used by the district in the construction, improvement, maintenance or operation of any project. Any municipality, county or special district is also authorized to transfer, assign and set over to any district any contracts which may have been awarded by the municipality, county or special district for the construction of projects not begun or if begun, not completed. The territory being served by any project or the territory within which the project is authorized to render service at the time of the acquisition of the project by a district shall include the area served by the project and the area in which the project is authorized to serve at the time of acquisition and any other area into which the service may be extended within the district, provided however, that where an election is required either by general law or charter provision to authorize such transfer, such election shall be forthwith called and shall be conducted as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 45; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.45.

§ 41-10-146.
Questions of validity to be given preference on court docket.

All cases in which there may arise a question of validity of the organization of the district, or a question of the validity of any provision of this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

] shall be advanced as a matter of immediate public interest and concern and heard at the earliest practicable moment. The court shall be open at all times for the purposes of this act.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 46; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.46.

§ 41-10-147.
Effect of failure to give notice; board of county commissioners to direct notice be given and continue hearing.

If notice is provided for in this act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

], and the board of county commissioners finds for any reason that due notice was not given, the board of county commissioners shall not lose jurisdiction and the proceeding in question shall not be void or abated. The board of county commissioners shall then direct due notice be given, continue the hearing until notice is properly given and shall proceed as though notice was properly given in the first instance.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 47; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.47; Laws 1983, ch. 176, § 1.

§ 41-10-148.
Reorganization of sanitary and improvement districts as sewer district or water and sewer district.

Any sanitary and improvement district organized pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

35-3-101

through

35-3-124

may effect its reorganization as a sewer district or water and sewer district pursuant to the provisions of this act. Upon filing of a petition for reorganization of a district by its governing body with the board of county commissioners having jurisdiction as provided in W.S.

41-10-103

, the board of county commissioners, by resolution duly entered, shall declare the district organized as a district pursuant to the provisions of this act and shall give the district the corporate name designated in the petition by which it shall be known in all proceedings. The board of county commissioners shall then designate as the first board of directors of the district the five (5) trustees of the sanitary and improvement district, each of which shall serve as a director until the expiration of his term as trustee and until a successor is elected at the next subsequent director election pursuant to W.S.

22-29-112

. At the next subsequent director election following organization of the district directors shall be elected for staggered terms as provided by W.S. 41-10-112(b). After entry of the resolution, the district shall be a governmental subdivision of the state of Wyoming and a body corporate with all the powers of a public or quasi-municipal corporation organized pursuant to this act. The validity of the organization may not be questioned directly or indirectly in any suit, action or proceeding except as provided in the Special District Elections Act of 1994. After entry of the resolution, the district shall comply with W.S.

41-10-108

through

41-10-110

and all other relevant provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 48; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.48; Laws 1983, ch. 176, § 1; 1998, ch. 115, § 2; 1999, ch. 162, § 1.

§ 41-10-149.
Full authority for authorization and issuance of bonds; effect on other statutes.

This act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

], without reference to other statutes of the state, except as herein specifically provided, shall constitute full authority for the authorization and issuance of bonds hereunder. No other act or law with regard to the authorization or issuance of bonds that provides for an election, requires an approval, or in any way impedes or restricts the carrying out of the acts herein authorized to be done shall be construed as applying to any proceedings taken hereunder or acts done pursuant hereto, it being intended that this act shall provide a separate method of accomplishing its objectives, and not an exclusive one, and this act shall not be construed as repealing, amending or changing any such other act or law.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 49; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.49.

§ 41-10-150.
Liberal construction.

This act [§§

41-10-101

through

41-10-151

] being necessary to secure the public health, safety, convenience and welfare, it shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 50; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.50.

§ 41-10-151.
Finances administered according to the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act.

The board of directors of the water and sewer districts shall administer the finances of such districts according to the provisions of the Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act, except that an annual audit in accordance with W.S.

16-4-121

is not required. Each water and sewer district shall comply with the provisions of W.S. 9-1-507(a)(iii).

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 52; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.51; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2019 ch. 184, § 1, effective March 8, 2019.

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 184 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “Uniform Municipal Fiscal Procedures Act” for “Wyoming Municipal Budget Act.”

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2019 amendment,

added "except that an annual audit in accordance with W.S.

16-4-121

is not required" at the end of the first sentence, and added the second sentence.

Municipal Budget Act. —

The Municipal Budget Act, referred to in this section, appeared as §§ 9-7-301 through 9-7-316 before being repealed in 1980.

Severability. —

Laws 1959, ch. 188, § 51, reads: “If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.”

§ 41-10-152.
City or town may annex areas within sewer or water district.

Any city or town may annex areas to its corporate limits in accordance with the statutes governing annexation of territories to cities and towns which territories fall within existing water, sewer, or water and sewer districts, hereinafter referred to as “districts”, whether singular or plural.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.52.

Evidence supports summary judgment in favor of annexation. —

Where a majority of landowners were informed by a town attorney's letter that the area to be annexed was within the water and sewer district, that the town did not intend to assume the district's debts and that the properties within the boundaries of the area to be annexed would continue to be served by the district instead of the town, where those who were not agreeable to the town's refusal to assume the bonded indebtedness did not object and where there is no counteraffidavit or evidence of any kind indicating that less than a majority of the landowners in the annexed area approved the town's nonassumption of the water and sewer district's debts, the record is sufficient to support a summary judgment in favor of annexation. Miller v. Mills, 590 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 41-10-153.
Obligations and authority remain with district.

Upon the annexation of such territory the securities of the district, including but not limited to short-term notes, general obligation bonds and other like securities, revenue bonds and other like securities, special assessment bonds and other like securities shall remain the obligations of the districts and the districts shall remain in possession, ownership and operation of its equipment, plant and facilities. The subscribers of the services of such district shall continue to be served by the districts. The taxing power and authority of the districts shall continue and shall be in addition to any taxing authority of the annexing city or town. A properly filed map showing the overlapping authorities shall be deemed compliant with the provisions of W.S. 39-13-102(p).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.53; 2009, ch. 56, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the last sentence.

§ 41-10-154.
Administration may be transferred to city or town by agreement.

Concurrently with the annexation of such territory the city or town and districts may by agreement provide that the administration of any outstanding indebtedness of the district may be taken over by the city or town but neither the city or town nor any agent or employee thereof shall be liable for the payment of the indebtedness. The city or town and districts may further provide that the city or town may take over the operation and management of the plant facilities or equipment of the district, the operation, maintenance and expense of operations to be paid for out of revenue derived by the districts.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.54.

§ 41-10-155.
Obligation to provide services remains with district; limitation.

The territory and inhabitants of the annexed area have all rights, privileges and duties set forth in W.S.

15-1-410

except the city or town shall have no obligation to furnish water or sewerage services to the inhabitants and annexed area. The duty to provide water or sewerage services and facilities to the territory shall remain the obligation of the district until such time as the plant facility and equipment of the districts have been acquired by the city.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.55.

§ 41-10-156.
Bonding authority of city or town to acquire district facilities; limitations; administration of indebtedness.

Any city or town may acquire by purchase, gift or otherwise the plant facility and equipment of such district and incorporate the plant facility and equipment into its municipally owned water works or sewerage system. The city or town may finance the purchase of the plant facility and equipment by issuing its general obligation bonds or other like securities, or revenue bonds or other like securities payable solely from the revenues derived from the operation of the water or sewerage districts. The bonds may be issued in accordance with the provisions of law. The revenues produced by the bonds issued by the city or town shall be placed in escrow and used to retire the obligations of the district in accordance with the terms and conditions thereof.

Upon the acquisition of such territory by the city the existing bonded indebtedness of the district shall remain a superior obligation to any other bonded indebtedness of the city or town, with respect to such land only, and the bonded indebtedness of the district shall in no way affect the bonded indebtedness or limitations on the bonding capacity of the city or town.

When the governing body of the city or town determines to acquire by purchase, gift or otherwise the plant facilities and equipment of a district, it shall adopt an ordinance describing in a general manner the assets of the districts to be acquired, the purchase price thereof, the amount of revenue bonds proposed to be issued, the maturity or maturities, the interest rate and other details in connection with the bonds. The ordinance may provide that the bonds or those specified shall be to the extent and in the manner prescribed in the ordinance subordinated to any other bonds payable from the revenue of the water or sewerage system of the city or town. The ordinance may contain such covenants and restrictions upon the issuance of additional revenue bonds which share equally from the revenues of the system as may be necessary or advisable to assure the payment of the bonds hereby authorized. The ordinance may provide the revenue bonds or any part thereof may be sold to the state of Wyoming or the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof at private sale without advertisement for not less than par and accrued interest. The ordinance may provide that the bonds be redeemable with or without premium at the time or place the governing body provides.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.56.

§ 41-10-157.
Application.

The provisions of this act [§§

41-10-152

through

41-10-157

] shall not be effective unless a majority of landowners owning more than half of the land sought to be annexed under this act approve the annexation and the nonassumption of indebtedness by the municipality.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 117, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-479.57.

Evidence supports summary judgment in favor of annexation. —

Where a majority of landowners were informed by a town attorney's letter that the area to be annexed was within the water and sewer district, that the town did not intend to assume the district's debts and that the properties within the boundaries of the area to be annexed would continue to be served by the district instead of the town, where those who were not agreeable to the town's refusal to assume the bonded indebtedness did not object and where there is no counteraffidavit or evidence of any kind indicating that less than a majority of the landowners in the annexed area approved the town's nonassumption of the water and sewer district's debts, the record is sufficient to support a summary judgment in favor of annexation. Miller v. Mills, 590 P.2d 378,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 360

(Wyo. 1979).